Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1537
Lands unsold; additional writs.

If lands and tenements levied on as aforesaid are not sold upon one execution, other executions may be issued to sell the lands so levied upon.

R.S.1867, Code § 504, p. 479;

R.S.1913, § 8083;

C.S.1922, § 9019;

C.S.1929, § 20-1537;

R.S.1943, § 25-1537.

Legislature has made writ of venditioni exponas applicable to sales of real estate. Burkett v. Clark, 46 Neb. 466, 64 N.W. 1113 (1895).